Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-4005
Act; enforcement; violation; penalty.

(1) The department shall enforce the Nebraska Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act.

(2) An employer who violates section 48-4003 shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than one hundred dollars for each day of the violation.

(3) The civil penalty provided for in this section shall be the exclusive remedy for any violation of the Nebraska Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act. Under the act, a court shall not have authority to enjoin a business closing or mass layoff.

Laws 2026, LB921, § 5.
July 18, 2026